California, session 20252026, AB2604.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3019.2 is added to the Elections Code, to read:3019.2. (a) The Secretary of State shall implement and make available to county registrars elections officials a system that allows voters to access text-message-based electronic signature curing.(b) For purposes of this section, “signature curing” means following the procedures described in subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 3019.(c) Any service provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall ensure data privacy and ballot security for voters.(d) The Secretary of State shall make available on its internet website data relating to this program, including, by county: the number of voters who cured missing or mismatched signatures or signatures that do not compare, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 3019, using text-message-based electronic signature curing and the number of voters to whom text-message-based electronic signature curing was offered.(e) The Secretary of State may combine the system described in this section with the systems described in Sections 3019.5 and 3019.7.